District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
29 act may be cited as the “Vehicular Noise Reduction Act of 2025”.
30 Sec. 2. Definitions.
31 For the purposes of this act, the term:
32 (1) “Decibel reader” means a measuring instrument used to assess noise or sound levels
33 by measuring sound pressure expressed in decibel (dB) units.
34 (2) “Motor vehicle noise limits” means the noise limits prescribed pursuant to 20 DCMR
35 § 2811.
36 (3) “Operator of a photo noise violation monitoring device” means a natural or legal
37 person authorized to set up, test, or operate the noise violation monitoring device described

38 herein.
39 (4) “Photo noise violation monitoring device” means one or more mobile or fixed vehicle
40 sensors installed to work in conjunction with one or more noise measuring apparatuses such as a
41 decibel reader which automatically produces two or more photographs, two or more
42 microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of each motor vehicle at the time it is
43 used or operated in violation of the motor vehicle noise limits pursuant to 20 DCMR § 2811.
44 Sec. 3. Photo noise violation monitoring device program established.
45 The District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”), in consultation with the
46 Department of Energy and Environment (“DOEE”), shall establish a two-year demonstration
47 program of photo noise violation monitoring devices using acoustic imaging technology to
48 identify violators of District motor vehicle noise law pursuant to 20 DCMR § 2811.
49 Sec. 4. Violations authorization and fines.
50 (a) The Mayor is authorized to use a photo noise violation monitoring device to detect
51 noise violations. Proof of a violation may be evidenced by information obtained through the use
52 of a photo noise violation monitoring device.
53 (b) The Mayor shall impose a fine for a violation detected by a photo noise violation
54 monitoring device.
55 Sec. 5. Demonstration program implementation.
56 As part of the implementation of the demonstration program, DDOT shall:
57 (a) Conduct an acoustical engineering study to determine appropriate noise detection
58 equipment and placement location options;
59 (b) Consult with ward Councilmembers to determine best noise camera placement
60 locations within their ward;
2

61 (c) Test photo noise violation monitoring devices to determine the most appropriate
62 device for use in the District;
63 (d) Provide a report to the Council describing how the placement of each noise detection
64 device was determined;
65 (e) Install signs giving notice to approaching motor vehicle operators where a photo
66 noise violation monitoring device is in use;
67 (f) Install at least 2 photo noise violation monitoring locations in each of the 8 District
68 Wards; and
69 (g) Collect appropriate data on the effectiveness of the photo noise violation monitoring
70 devices.
71 Sec. 6. Demonstration program reporting.
72 One year after the effective date of this act and 60 days after the conclusion of the
73 demonstration project, DDOT shall submit a report on the results of the demonstration program
74 to the Council. The report shall include:
75 (a) The locations where and dates when photo noise violation monitoring devices were
76 used;
77 (b) The total number of violations recorded by photo noise violation monitoring devices
78 on a daily, weekly and monthly basis;
79 (c) The total number of notices of violation issued for violations recorded by the installed
80 devices;
81 (d) The number of fines and total amount of fines paid after the first notice of violation
82 issued for violations recorded by the devices;
83 (e) The number of violations adjudicated and the results of such adjudications including
3

84 breakdowns of dispositions made for violations recorded by the devices;
85 (f) The total amount of revenue realized by the District in connection with the program;
86 (g) A cost-benefit analysis of the different types of technology tested pursuant to this act;
87 (h) The expenses incurred by the District in connection with the demonstration program;
88 and
89 (i) A description of the quality of the adjudication process and its results.
90 Sec. 7. Calibration requirements for photo noise violation monitoring devices.
91 (a) No photo noise violation monitoring device shall be used unless it has undergone a
92 calibration check performed pursuant to this section.
93 (1) Each photo noise violation monitoring device shall undergo:
94 (A) An annual calibration check performed by an independent calibration
95 laboratory which shall issue a signed certificate of calibration; and
96 (B) A successfully passed self-test of its functions on the day it is used to
97 record a noise violation;
98 (2) The department shall keep each annual certificate of calibration on file until
99 the final resolution of all cases involving a notice of violation issued during the year which were
100 based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images produced by the
101 photo noise violation monitoring device.
102 (3) It shall be a defense to any prosecution for a violation of motor vehicle noise
103 limits pursuant to this section that a photo noise violation monitoring device was malfunctioning
104 at the time of the alleged violation.
105 Sec. 8. Operator training for photo noise violation monitoring devices.
106 (a) Operators of a photo noise violation monitoring device shall have completed training
4

107 in the procedures for setting up, testing, and operating the device.
108 (b) Each operator shall maintain a daily camera log report for each device that states:
109 (1) The date and time when, and the location where, the device was set up that
110 day; and
111 (2) That the operator successfully performed, and the device passed, the self-tests
112 of the device before producing a recorded image that day.
113 (c) The District shall retain each daily camera log report until the later of the date on
114 which the photo noise violation monitoring device to which it applies has been permanently
115 removed from use or the final resolution of all cases involving notices of violation issued based
116 on photographs, microphotographs, video, or other recorded images produced by the device.
117 Sec. 9. Use of a photo noise violation monitoring device image.
118 (a) The demonstration program shall utilize necessary technologies to ensure to the
119 extent practicable, that photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images
120 produced by a photo noise violation monitoring device shall not include images that identify the
121 driver, the passengers, or the contents of the motor vehicle.
122 (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, no notice of violation issued pursuant
123 to this section shall be dismissed solely because a photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or
124 other recorded image allows for the identification of the driver, the passengers, or the contents of
125 motor vehicles where the department shows that it made reasonable efforts to comply with the
126 provisions of this paragraph in case.
127 (c) Any photograph, microphotograph, videotape or other recorded image from a photo
128 noise violation monitoring device shall be for the exclusive use of the District for the purpose of
129 the adjudication of liability of the motor vehicle owner receiving a notice of violation, and shall
5

130 be destroyed by the department upon the final resolution of the notice of violation to which the
131 photograph, microphotograph, videotape or other recorded image relates, or one year following
132 the date of issuance of the notice of violation, whichever is later.
133 (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a
134 photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image from a photo noise violation
135 monitoring device shall not be available to the public, nor subject to civil or criminal process or
136 discovery, nor used by any court or administrative or adjudicatory body in any action or
137 proceeding therein except that which is necessary for the adjudication of a notice of violation,
138 and no public entity or employee, officer or agent thereof shall disclose the information, except
139 that a photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image from a device:
140 (1) Shall be available for inspection and copying and use by the motor vehicle
141 owner and operator for so long as the photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other
142 recorded images are required to be maintained or are maintained by the public entity, employee,
143 officer, or agent;
144 (2) Shall be furnished for use in a criminal action or proceeding when described
145 in a search warrant issued by a court authorized to issue a search warrant or a federal court
146 authorized to issue a search warrant under federal law, where the search warrant states that there
147 is reasonable cause to believe information constitutes evidence of, or tends to demonstrate that, a
148 misdemeanor or felony offense was committed in this state or another state, or that a particular
149 person participated in the commission of a misdemeanor or felony offense in this state or another
150 state, provided, that if the offense was against the laws of another state, the court shall only issue
151 a warrant if the conduct comprising the offense would, if occurring in this state, constitute a
152 misdemeanor or felony against the laws of this state; and
6

153 (3) Shall be furnished for use in a criminal action or proceeding in response to a
154 subpoena duces tecum signed by a judge of competent jurisdiction and issued pursuant the
155 criminal procedure law or a judge or magistrate of a federal court authorized to issue a subpoena
156 duces tecum under federal law, where the judge finds and the subpoena states that there is
157 reasonable cause to believe the information is relevant and material to the prosecution, or the
158 defense, or the investigation by an authorized law enforcement official, of the alleged
159 commission of a misdemeanor or felony in the District or another state, provided, that if the
160 offense was against the laws of another state, the judge or magistrate shall only issue a subpoena
161 if the conduct comprising the offense would, if occurring in the District, constitute a
162 misdemeanor or felony in the District; and
163 (4) May be used in a criminal action or proceeding if lawfully obtained pursuant
164 to this section and otherwise admissible.
165 Sec. 10. Photo noise violation monitoring device image as evidence.
166 (a) A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed by the city, or a
167 facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other
168 recorded images produced by a photo noise violation monitoring device, shall be prima facie
169 evidence of the facts contained therein.
170 (b) Any photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images
171 evidencing a violation shall include at least two date and time stamped images of the rear of the
172 motor vehicle that include the same stationary object near the motor vehicle and shall be
173 available for inspection reasonably in advance of and at any proceeding to adjudicate the liability
174 for the violation.
175 Sec. 11. Vehicle and transportation noise-reducing strategies study and report.
7

176 In Fiscal Year 2026, DDOT, in consultation with DOEE, shall conduct a study on vehicle
177 and other transportation-related noise and identify and evaluate short-term and long-term
178 strategies for reducing vehicle and other transportation-related noise, including noise-reducing
179 roadway material. DDOT shall provide a report to the Council within one year of enactment of
180 this Act to include recommendations on the feasibility, efficacy, and environmental impact of the
181 identified noise-reducing strategies as well as a cost-benefit analysis of identified strategies.
182 Sec. 12. Vehicle repair subsidy program established.
183 The Department of Motor Vehicles (“DMV”) shall create a non-means tested program to
184 subsidize, in full or in part, the cost of repairing a vehicle to bring it within the motor vehicle
185 noise limits pursuant to 20 DCMR § 2811. This program shall apply to:
186 (a) Vehicles that are:
187 (1) Registered in the District;
188 (2) Registered in another jurisdiction to a person employed in the District; or
189 (3) Registered in another jurisdiction but operated in the District for commercial
190 or business purposes.
191 (b) Vehicles that are in violation of the motor vehicle noise limits pursuant to 20 DCMR
192 § 2811, regardless of whether that vehicle has been assessed a fine pursuant to
193 Section 4 of this Act.
194 (c) Only the repairs necessary to reduce noise and bring the vehicle into compliance with
195 the motor vehicle noise limits pursuant to 20 DCMR § 2811, including necessary
196 repairs caused by:
197 (1) Normal wear and tear;
198 (2) Purposeful alteration,
8

199 (3) Outdated machinery or mechanics; or
200 (4) Accidental damage.
201 (d) Each eligible vehicle no more than once.
202 Sec. 13. Waiver of fine.
203 A photo noise violation fine shall be waived if the vehicle is brought into compliance
204 with District motor vehicle noise law pursuant to 20 DCMR § 2811.
205 Sec. 14. Rulemaking.
206 Within 180 days of the effective date of this act, the Mayor shall promulgate rules to
207 implement this act. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of
208 review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council
209 does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this
210 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.
211 Sec. 15. Applicability.
212 (a) This act shall take effect subject to the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
213 budget and financial plan.
214 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect
215 in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
216 Council of the certification.
217 (c) (1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
218 the District of Columbia Register.
219 (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
220 applicability of this act.
221 Sec. 16. Fiscal impact statement.
9

222 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
223 impact statement required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
224 approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §l-206.02(c)(3)).
225 Sec. 17. Effective date.
226 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
227 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
228 provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
229 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
230 Columbia Register.
10